Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.030

Secretary's authority.

(1) The secretary or the secretary's designee has the full authority to administer oaths and take testimony, to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses before him or her together with all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and to compel the disclosure by those witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation.

(2) Subpoenas issued in adjudicative proceedings are governed by RCW 34.05.588(1).

(3) Subpoenas issued in the conduct of investigations required or authorized by other statutory provisions or necessary in the enforcement of other statutory provisions are governed by RCW 34.05.588(2).

(4) When a judicially approved subpoena is required by law, the secretary or the secretary's designee may apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or in the county where the subpoenaed documents, records, or evidence are located, or in Thurston county. The application must:

(a) State that an order is sought under this section;

(b) Adequately specify the documents, records, evidence, or testimony; and

(c) Include a declaration made under oath that an investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents, records, evidence, or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the department's authority.

(5) When an application under subsection (4) of this section is made to the satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the subpoena. When a judicially approved subpoena is required by law, an order under this subsection constitutes authority of law for the agency to subpoena the documents, records, evidence, or testimony.

(6) The secretary or the secretary's designee may seek approval and a court may issue an order under this section without prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation. An application for court approval is subject to the fee and process set forth in RCW 36.18.012(3).

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 106.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.